dictsource/fr_rules
// symbols that are normally spoken when reading text
//        , (D       pilk:u
_L16_)	: (_L17D_	Wr	// Say time
        $          dOlar
        °          d@gre
   _n_) °                    // n°
   	' (C	_^_en
